Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.450

Local enforcement of subchapter—Enforcement of chapter.

(1) The director and the officials of all incorporated cities and towns where electrical inspections are required by local ordinances, allowed by RCW 19.28.141, may require by local ordinance the enforcement of this subchapter in their respective jurisdictions. If an incorporated city or town elects to enforce this subchapter, the city or town has the power and shall enforce the provisions of this subchapter.

(2) The director, through the chief electrical inspector and other inspectors appointed under RCW 19.28.321, shall enforce this chapter. Compliance enforcement may be performed by contractor compliance inspectors appointed under chapter 18.27 RCW. The expenses of the director and the salaries and expenses of state inspectors incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be paid entirely out of the electrical license fund, on vouchers approved by the director.

[ 2000 c 238 s 209.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.